Hawaii statutes.
§652-4 Satisfying judgment. In case
there is certified to any garnishee a judgment for the plaintiff, from or to
which no appeal or execution at the time of its rendition, has been noted the
garnishee shall pay to the plaintiff such sums as theretofore have been
sequestered and not drawn against in pursuance of the action if the judgment
equals or exceeds such sums. If the amount sequestered and not drawn against
does not suffice to extinguish the judgment, then such sequestration and
delivery to the plaintiff by the garnishee of a sum equal to the percentage of
wages required to be withheld by section 652-1 shall continue from week to
week, or from month to month, until the judgment, with legal interest thereon,
is fully paid, or until the defendant quits the service of and dissolves the
defendant's relation to the garnishee upon which sequestration is founded. [L
1907, c 99, §2; am L 1921, c 66, §1; RL 1925, §2829; am L 1927, c 96, §4; am L
1933, c 172, §1; RL 1935, §4273; RL 1945, §10304; RL 1955, §237-4; HRS §652-4;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next